Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 14. Food Establishment Licensing

§§ 35-7-1401 through 35-7-1408.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see §

35-7-124

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1993, ch. 9, § 1, related to the licensing of food establishments.